Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1009.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2355, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 27, O.S.L. 2023, 1st


Extraordinary Session of the 59th Oklahoma Legislature (68 O.S.


Supp. 2024, Section 2355), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2355. A. Individuals. For all taxable years beginning


after December 31, 1998, and before January 1, 2006, a tax is hereby


imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable income of every resident or

Req. No. 10507 Page 1


nonresident individual, which tax shall be computed at the option of


the taxpayer under one of the two following methods:


1. METHOD 1.


a. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately not deducting federal income tax:


(1) 1/2% tax on first $1,000.00 or part thereof,


(2) 1% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(3) 2% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(4) 3% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(5) 4% tax on next $1,300.00 or part thereof,


(6) 5% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(7) 6% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof, and


(8) (a) for taxable years beginning after December


31, 1998, and before January 1, 2002, 6.75%


tax on the remainder,


(b) for taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2002, and before January 1, 2004,


7% tax on the remainder, and


(c) for taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2004, 6.65% tax on the remainder.


b. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving


spouse to the extent and in the manner that a


surviving spouse is permitted to file a joint return


under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code and

Req. No. 10507 Page 2


heads of households as defined in the Internal Revenue


Code not deducting federal income tax:


(1) 1/2% tax on first $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(2) 1% tax on next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(3) 2% tax on next $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(4) 3% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(5) 4% tax on next $2,400.00 or part thereof,


(6) 5% tax on next $2,800.00 or part thereof,


(7) 6% tax on next $6,000.00 or part thereof, and


(8) (a) for taxable years beginning after December


31, 1998, and before January 1, 2002, 6.75%


tax on the remainder,


(b) for taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2002, and before January 1, 2004,


7% tax on the remainder, and


(c) for taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2004, 6.65% tax on the remainder.


2. METHOD 2.


a. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately deducting federal income tax:


(1) 1/2% tax on first $1,000.00 or part thereof,


(2) 1% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(3) 2% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(4) 3% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,

Req. No. 10507 Page 3


(5) 4% tax on next $1,200.00 or part thereof,


(6) 5% tax on next $1,400.00 or part thereof,


(7) 6% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(8) 7% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(9) 8% tax on next $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(10) 9% tax on next $3,500.00 or part thereof, and


(11) 10% tax on the remainder.


b. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving


spouse to the extent and in the manner that a


surviving spouse is permitted to file a joint return


under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code and


heads of households as defined in the Internal Revenue


Code deducting federal income tax:


(1) 1/2% tax on the first $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(2) 1% tax on the next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(3) 2% tax on the next $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(4) 3% tax on the next $1,400.00 or part thereof,


(5) 4% tax on the next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(6) 5% tax on the next $1,600.00 or part thereof,


(7) 6% tax on the next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(8) 7% tax on the next $1,750.00 or part thereof,


(9) 8% tax on the next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(10) 9% tax on the next $6,000.00 or part thereof, and


(11) 10% tax on the remainder.

Req. No. 10507 Page 4


B. Individuals. For all taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2008, and ending any tax year which begins after December


31, 2015, for which the determination required pursuant to Sections


and 5 of this act is made by the State Board of Equalization, a


tax is hereby imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable income of every


resident or nonresident individual, which tax shall be computed as


follows:


1. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately:


(a) 1/2% tax on first $1,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 1% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(c) 2% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(d) 3% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(e) 4% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(f) 5% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(g) 5.50% tax on the remainder for the 2008 tax year and


any subsequent tax year unless the rate prescribed by


subparagraph (h) of this paragraph is in effect, and


(h) 5.25% tax on the remainder for the 2009 and subsequent


tax years. The decrease in the top marginal


individual income tax rate otherwise authorized by


this subparagraph shall be contingent upon the


determination required to be made by the State Board



Req. No. 10507 Page 5


of Equalization pursuant to Section 2355.1A of this


title.


2. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving spouse to


the extent and in the manner that a surviving spouse is permitted to


file a joint return under the provisions of the Internal Revenue


Code and heads of households as defined in the Internal Revenue


Code:


(a) 1/2% tax on first $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 1% tax on next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(c) 2% tax on next $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(d) 3% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(e) 4% tax on next $2,400.00 or part thereof,


(f) 5% tax on next $2,800.00 or part thereof,


(g) 5.50% tax on the remainder for the 2008 tax year and


any subsequent tax year unless the rate prescribed by


subparagraph (h) of this paragraph is in effect, and


(h) 5.25% tax on the remainder for the 2009 and subsequent


tax years. The decrease in the top marginal


individual income tax rate otherwise authorized by


this subparagraph shall be contingent upon the


determination required to be made by the State Board


of Equalization pursuant to Section 2355.1A of this


title.



Req. No. 10507 Page 6


C. Individuals. For all taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2022 2024, and ending not later than December 31, 2024, a


tax is hereby imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable income of every


resident or nonresident individual, which tax shall be computed as


follows:


1. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately:


(a) 0.25% tax on first $1,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 0.75% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(c) 1.75% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(d) 2.75% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(e) 3.75% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(f) 4.75% tax on the remainder.


2. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving spouse to


the extent and in the manner that a surviving spouse is permitted to


file a joint return under the provisions of the Internal Revenue


Code and heads of households as defined in the Internal Revenue


Code:


(a) 0.25% tax on first $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 0.75% tax on next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(c) 1.75% tax on next $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(d) 2.75% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(e) 3.75% tax on next $4,600.00 or part thereof,


(f) 4.75% tax on the remainder.

Req. No. 10507 Page 7


No deduction for federal income taxes paid shall be allowed to


any taxpayer to arrive at taxable income.


D. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the


rate of tax otherwise prescribed by each of subparagraphs (a)


through (f) of paragraph 1 and paragraph 2 of subsection C of this


section, expressed as a decimal, shall be divided by the whole


number ten (10). The result of that computation shall be the


numeral used for a reduction of the otherwise applicable income tax


rate in each of those subparagraphs for each income tax year


beginning with the 2025 income tax year. Each income tax rate shall


be reduced by the amount resulting from the computation required by


this subsection for each taxable year until the rate of tax equals


zero (0). No income tax shall be imposed for any individual income


tax year thereafter.


E. Nonresident aliens. In lieu of the rates set forth in this


subsection A above, there shall be imposed on nonresident aliens, as


defined in the Internal Revenue Code, a tax of eight percent (8%),


or the applicable amount based upon the income tax rate reductions


prescribed by subsection D of this section, instead of thirty


percent (30%) as used in the Internal Revenue Code, with respect to


the Oklahoma taxable income of such nonresident aliens as determined


under the provision of the Oklahoma Income Tax Act.


F. Every payer of amounts covered by this subsection E of this


section shall deduct and withhold from such amounts paid each payee

Req. No. 10507 Page 8


an amount equal to eight percent (8%) the applicable percentage


thereof based upon the income tax rate reductions prescribed by


subsection D of this section. Every payer required to deduct and


withhold taxes under this subsection shall for each quarterly period


on or before the last day of the month following the close of each


such quarterly period, pay over the amount so withheld as taxes to


the Tax Commission, and shall file a return with each such payment.


Such return shall be in such form as the Tax Commission shall


prescribe. Every payer required under this subsection to deduct and


withhold a tax from a payee shall, as to the total amounts paid to


each payee during the calendar year, furnish to such payee, on or


before January 31, of the succeeding year, a written statement


showing the name of the payer, the name of the payee and the payee's


Social Security account number, if any, the total amount paid


subject to taxation, and the total amount deducted and withheld as


tax and such other information as the Tax Commission may require.


Any payer who fails to withhold or pay to the Tax Commission any


sums herein required to be withheld or paid shall be personally and


individually liable therefor to the State of Oklahoma.


E. G. Corporations. For all taxable years beginning after


December 31, 2021, a A tax is hereby imposed upon the Oklahoma


taxable income of every corporation doing business within this state


or deriving income from sources within this state in an amount equal



Req. No. 10507 Page 9


to four percent (4%) thereof or the applicable reduced percentage as


prescribed by this subsection.


1. There shall be no additional Oklahoma income tax imposed on


accumulated taxable income or on undistributed personal holding


company income as those terms are defined in the Internal Revenue


Code thereof.


2. For all taxable years for corporations using a calendar year


for income tax reporting purposes, the changes in the income tax


rate prescribed by this paragraph shall become effective January 1,


2025. For all taxable years for corporations using a fiscal year


for income tax reporting purposes, the changes in the income tax


rate prescribed by this paragraph shall become effective for the


first tax year which begins after January 1, 2025. The rate of tax


otherwise imposed pursuant to the provisions of this subsection,


expressed as a decimal, shall be divided by the whole number ten


(10). The result of that computation shall be the numeral used for


a reduction of the otherwise applicable income tax rate beginning


with the 2025 income tax year. The income tax rate otherwise


prescribed by this subsection shall be reduced by the amount


resulting from the computation required by this paragraph for each


taxable year until the rate of tax equals zero (0). No income tax


shall be imposed for any income tax year thereafter.


F. H. Certain foreign corporations.



Req. No. 10507 Page 10


1. In lieu of the tax imposed in the first paragraph of


subsection D of by this section, for all taxable years beginning


after December 31, 2021, there shall be imposed on foreign


corporations, as defined in the Internal Revenue Code, a tax of four


percent (4%) instead of thirty percent (30%) as used in the Internal


Revenue Code, where such income is received from sources within


Oklahoma, in accordance with the provisions of the Internal Revenue


Code and the Oklahoma Income Tax Act.


2. For all taxable years for corporations using a calendar year


for income tax reporting purposes, the changes in the income tax


rate prescribed by this paragraph shall become effective January 1,


2025. For all taxable years for corporations using a fiscal year


for income tax reporting purposes, the changes in the income tax


rate prescribed by this paragraph shall become effective for the


first tax year which begins after January 1, 2025. The rate of tax


otherwise imposed pursuant to the provisions of this subsection,


expressed as a decimal, shall be divided by the whole number ten


(10). The result of that computation shall be the numeral used for


a reduction of the otherwise applicable income tax rate beginning


with the 2025 income tax year. The income tax rate otherwise


prescribed by this subsection shall be reduced by the amount


resulting from the computation required by this paragraph for each


taxable year until the rate of tax equals zero (0). No income tax


shall be imposed for any income tax year thereafter.

Req. No. 10507 Page 11


Every payer of amounts covered by this subsection shall deduct


and withhold from such amounts paid each payee an amount equal to


four percent (4%) the applicable percentage thereof based upon the


income tax rate reductions prescribed by paragraph 2 of this


subsection. Every payer required to deduct and withhold taxes under


this subsection shall for each quarterly period on or before the


last day of the month following the close of each such quarterly


period, pay over the amount so withheld as taxes to the Tax


Commission, and shall file a return with each such payment. Such


return shall be in such form as the Tax Commission shall prescribe.


Every payer required under this subsection to deduct and withhold a


tax from a payee shall, as to the total amounts paid to each payee


during the calendar year, furnish to such payee, on or before


January 31, of the succeeding year, a written statement showing the


name of the payer, the name of the payee and the payee's Social


Security account number, if any, the total amounts paid subject to


taxation, the total amount deducted and withheld as tax and such


other information as the Tax Commission may require. Any payer who


fails to withhold or pay to the Tax Commission any sums herein


required to be withheld or paid shall be personally and individually


liable therefor to the State of Oklahoma.


G. I. Fiduciaries. A tax is hereby imposed upon the Oklahoma


taxable income of every trust and estate at the same rates as are


provided in subsection B or, C, or D of this section for single

Req. No. 10507 Page 12


individuals. Fiduciaries are not allowed a deduction for any


federal income tax paid.


H. J. Tax rate tables. For all taxable years beginning after


December 31, 1991 2024, in lieu of the tax imposed by subsection A,


B or, C, or D of this section, as applicable there is hereby imposed


for each taxable year on the taxable income of every individual,


whose taxable income for such taxable year does not exceed the


ceiling amount, a tax determined under tables, applicable to such


taxable year which shall be prescribed by the Tax Commission and


which shall be in such form as it determines appropriate. In the


table so prescribed, the amounts of the tax shall be computed on the


basis of the rates prescribed by subsection A, B or, C, or D of this


section. For purposes of this subsection, the term "ceiling amount"


means, with respect to any taxpayer, the amount determined by the


Tax Commission for the tax rate category in which such taxpayer


falls.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2355.1P-4,


is amended to read as follows:


Section 2355.1P-4 A. For Except as otherwise provided by


subsection I of this section, for tax years beginning on or after


January 1, 2022, there is hereby levied on each electing pass-


through entity the pass-through entity tax which shall be calculated


as follows:



Req. No. 10507 Page 13


1. With regard to each member of an electing pass-through


entity, the electing pass-through entity shall multiply such


member's Oklahoma distributive share of the electing pass-through


entity's Oklahoma net entity income for the tax year by:


a. the highest Oklahoma marginal income tax rate levied


on the taxable income of natural persons pursuant to


Section 2355 of this title if the member is an


individual, trust, or estate,


b. four percent (4%) if the member is classified as a


corporation pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code, and


is not classified as an S corporation,


c. four percent (4%) if the member is a pass-through


entity,


d. four percent (4%) if the member is a financial


institution subject to tax imposed pursuant to the


provisions of Section 2370 of this title, and


e. the highest Oklahoma marginal income tax rate that


would be applicable to any item of the electing pass-


through entity's income or gain without the election


made pursuant to subsection F of this section, if the


member is an organization described in Section 2359 of


this title; and


2. The electing pass-through entity shall aggregate the amounts


determined with respect to all members pursuant to paragraph 1 of

Req. No. 10507 Page 14


this subsection and the pass-through entity tax for the applicable


tax year shall be equal to such aggregated tax amount for the tax


year with respect to which the election has been made.


B. Sections 2385.29, 2385.30 and 2385.31 of this title shall


not be applicable to an electing pass-through entity.


C. The pass-through entity tax shall be due and payable on the


same date as provided for the filing of the electing pass-through


entity's Oklahoma income tax return, and for tax years beginning on


or after January 1, 2020, estimated tax payments shall be required


as provided in Section 2385.9 of this title.


D. If the pass-through entity election results in a net entity


loss for Oklahoma income tax purposes in any tax year, the net


entity loss may be carried back and carried forward by the electing


pass-through entity for Oklahoma income tax purposes as set forth in


subparagraph b of paragraph 3 of subsection A of Section 2358 of


this title.


E. Notwithstanding paragraph 2 of subsection C of Section 2368


of this title, a nonresident individual who is a member of an


electing pass-through entity is not required to file an Oklahoma


income tax return, if, for the taxable year, the only source of


income allocable or apportionable to this state for the member, or,


if a joint income tax return is filed, the member and his or her


spouse, is from one or more electing pass-through entities, and each



Req. No. 10507 Page 15


electing pass-through entity files and pays the taxes due under this


section.


F. Any entity required to file an Oklahoma partnership income


tax return or an Oklahoma S corporation income tax return may elect


to become an electing pass-through entity. The election shall be


made on such form and in such manner as the Oklahoma Tax Commission


may prescribe, and any election under this subsection shall have


priority over and revoke any election to file a composite Oklahoma


partnership return or requirement of a Subchapter S corporation to


report and pay tax on behalf of a nonresident shareholder for the


same tax year.


G. Pursuant to procedures prescribed by the Tax Commission, if


the amount of tax required to be paid by a pass-through entity


pursuant to the provisions of this section is not paid when due, the


Oklahoma Tax Commission may revoke the pass-through entity's


election under subsection F of this section effective for the first


year for which the tax is not paid.


H. The election authorized by the provisions of this section


shall be made pursuant to procedures prescribed by the Tax


Commission and shall be filed (i) within sixty (60) days of


enactment and pursuant to procedures prescribed by the Oklahoma Tax


Commission for any income tax year beginning on or after January 1,


2019, and prior to January 1, 2020, or (ii) for any income tax year


beginning on or after January 1, 2020, at any time during the

Req. No. 10507 Page 16


preceding tax year or two (2) months and fifteen (15) days after the


beginning of the tax year. Any such election shall be binding until


revoked pursuant to procedures prescribed by the Tax Commission.


The effective date of a revocation (i) made within two (2) months


and fifteen (15) days of the electing pass-through entity's taxable


year shall be the first day of such taxable year and (ii) made


during the electing pass-through entity's taxable year but after


such fifteenth day shall be effective on the first day of the


following taxable year. No election made by a pass-through entity


with respect to income tax to be paid by such entity using the


calculations prescribed by this section shall be binding on any


other pass-through entity, and each pass-through entity shall be


able to make an election under the provisions of this act


independently.


I. For all taxable years for corporations using a calendar year


for income tax reporting purposes, the changes in the income tax


rate prescribed by this subsection shall become effective January 1,


2025. For all taxable years for corporations using a fiscal year


for income tax reporting purposes, the changes in the income tax


rate prescribed by this subsection shall become effective for the


first tax year which begins after January 1, 2025. The rate of tax


otherwise imposed pursuant to the provisions of paragraph 1 of


subsection A of this section, expressed as a decimal, shall be


divided by the whole number ten (10). The result of that

Req. No. 10507 Page 17


computation shall be the numeral used for a reduction of the


otherwise applicable income tax rate beginning with the applicable


income tax year. The income tax rate otherwise prescribed by


paragraph 1 of subsection A of this section shall be reduced by the


amount resulting from the computation required by this subsection


for each taxable year until the rate of tax equals zero (0). No


income tax shall be imposed for any income tax year thereafter.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective January 1, 2025.




60-1-10507 MAH 12/09/24





























Req. No. 10507 Page 18